Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB730.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6856YC (1) 91 nls/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 15.352, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 9A. âRehabilitation projectâ means a 3 proposed housing project eligible to receive workforce housing 4 tax incentives under section 15.353 that meets all of the 5 following requirements: 6 a. The requirements of section 15.353, subsection 1, 7 paragraph âaâ . 8 b. The requirements of section 15.353, subsection 2, 9 paragraph âbâ . 10 c. The requirements of section 15.353, subsections 3 and 4. 11 d. The single-family dwelling units that will result from 12 the proposed housing project are intended for resale to buyers 13 who will occupy the units as primary residences. 14 Sec. 2. Section 15.354, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 15 by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the 16 following: 17 4. Maximum tax incentives amount. 18 a. In the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 19 June 30, 2027, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the 20 authority shall not award an amount of tax incentives in excess 21 of forty million dollars. 22 b. (1) Of the tax incentives allocated under paragraph âaâ , 23 fifty percent of the allocation available in each fiscal year 24 shall be reserved for allocation to qualified housing projects 25 in small cities. 26 (2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), if the sum of the 27 amount of tax incentives awarded in a given fiscal year 28 for housing projects located in small cities based on the 29 authorityâs review and scoring of applications does not exceed 30 the amount reserved for housing projects located in small 31 cities pursuant to subparagraph (1), the authority may award 32 the remaining amount of tax incentives reserved for housing 33 projects located in small cities to other housing projects 34 during that same fiscal year. 35 -1- LSB 6856YC (1) 91 nls/ko 1/ 4 H.F. _____ c. (1) Of the moneys allocated under paragraph âaâ , five 1 thousand dollars shall be reserved to award tax incentives to 2 rehabilitation projects. 3 (2) Of the tax incentives allocated under subparagraph (1), 4 fifty percent of the allocation available in each fiscal year 5 shall be reserved for allocation to rehabilitation projects in 6 small cities. 7 (3) Notwithstanding subparagraph (2), if the sum of the 8 amount of tax incentives awarded in a given fiscal year for 9 rehabilitation projects located in small cities based on 10 the authorityâs review and scoring of applications does not 11 exceed the amount reserved for rehabilitation projects located 12 in small cities pursuant to subparagraph (2), the authority 13 may award the remaining amount of tax incentives reserved 14 for rehabilitation projects located in small cities to other 15 rehabilitation projects during that same fiscal year. 16 d. Tax incentives revoked by the authority or irrevocably 17 declined by a housing business before June 30 of the fiscal 18 year following the award may be awarded during the fiscal year 19 the revocation or declination occurs. Tax incentives awarded 20 pursuant to this paragraph shall not be counted against the tax 21 incentives limit established in paragraph âaâ . 22 e. The maximum aggregate amount of tax incentives that 23 may be awarded and issued under section 15.355 to a housing 24 business for a housing project or rehabilitation project shall 25 not exceed one million dollars. 26 f. If a housing business qualifies for a higher amount 27 of tax incentives under section 15.355 than is allowed by 28 the limitation imposed in paragraph âeâ , the authority and 29 the housing business may negotiate an apportionment of the 30 reduction in tax incentives between the sales tax refund 31 provided in section 15.355, subsection 2, and the workforce 32 housing investment tax incentives provided in section 15.355, 33 subsection 3, provided the total aggregate amount of tax 34 incentives after the apportioned reduction does not exceed the 35 -2- LSB 6856YC (1) 91 nls/ko 2/ 4 H.F. _____ amount in paragraph âeâ . 1